en: Belgian bakery products
fr: Produits de boulangerie belges
hr: Belgijski pekarski proizvodi
nl: Belgische bakkerijproducten

en: Croatian bakery products
fr: Produits de boulangerie croates

en: Glyko Triantafyllo Agrou
el: Γλυκό Τριαντάφυλλο Αγρού, Glyko Triantafyllo Agrou

en: Koufeta Amygdalou Geroskipou
el: Κουφέτα Αμυγδάλου Γεροσκήπου, Koufeta Amygdalou Geroskipou

en: Loukoumi Geroskipou
el: Λουκούμι Γεροσκήπου, Loukoumi Geroskipou

en: Czech bakery products
fr: Produits de boulangerie tchèques

en: Bakery products from the Netherlands, Dutch bakery products
fr: Produits de boulangerie néerlandais
hr: Pekarski proizvodi iz nizozemske
nl: Bakkerijproducten uit Nederland, Nederlandse bakkersproducten

en: Sugar breads
fr: Pains au sucre
hr: Šećerni kruhovi
nl: Suikerbroden

en: German bakery products
de: Deutsche Backwaren
fr: Produits de boulangerie allemands
hr: Njemački pekarski proizvodi

en: Westphalian Pumpernickel
de: Westfälischer Pumpernickel

en: Hungarian bakery products
fr: Produits de boulangerie hongrois

en: Polish bakery products
fr: Produits de boulangerie polonais

en: Portuguese bakery products
fr: Produits de boulangerie portugais

en: Spanish bakery products
fr: Produits de boulangerie espagnols

en: Filled fougasse
fr: Fougasses, Fougasses garnies

en: Baguettes, French bread
xx: Baguettes, Baguette
ar: خبز فرنسي
az: Baget çörəyi
be: Французскі багет
bg: Франзела
bn: বাগেট
ca: Baguet
cs: Bageta
cv: Багет
da: Baguetter
el: Μπαγκέτα
eo: Bastonpanoj
es: Baguetes
fa: باگت
fi: Patongit, Patonki
fr: Baguettes, Baguettes de pain
gl: Bagueta
hr: Bageti
ht: Bagèt
hy: Ֆրանսիական բագետ
it: Baguette
ja: バゲット
ka: Ბაგეტი
kk: Багета
ko: 바게트
lt: Prancūziškas batonas, Prancūziška duona
lv: Bagete
mk: Багет
ml: ബാഗെറ്റ്
mt: Bagett
nb: Bagetter
nl: Stokbroden, Stokbrood
nn: Bagettar
pa: ਬਾਗੇਤ
pl: Bagietka
pt: Baguetes
ro: Baghete
ru: Французский багет
sk: Bageta
sl: Bageta
sr: Багет
sv: Baguetter
ta: பகெத்
th: บาแก็ต
tr: Francala
tt: Француз багет икмәге
uk: Французький багет
ur: باگیت
vi: Bánh mì Pháp
zh: 法式面包, 法式长棍面包, 法式長棍麵包

en: Frozen baguettes
da: Frosne baguetter
fr: Baguettes surgelées
sv: Frysta baguetter

en: Traditional French baguettes, Traditional French baguette, French traditional baguette
da: Traditionelle franske baguetter
fr: Baguettes de tradition française, Baguette de tradition française, baguettes traditionnelles françaises, baguette traditionnelle française, baguettes traditionnelles de France, baguette traditionnelle de France, baguettes tradition, baguette tradition, Baguettes de pain de tradition française
sv: Traditionella franska baguetter

en: Country-style French baguette breads, Country-style French baguette bread, Country-style French bread bread
fr: Baguette de campagne, Boule de pain de campagne

en: Unsalted baguettes, Unsalted French bread, French bread without salt
da: Usaltede baguetter, Baguetter uden salt
fr: Baguettes de pain sans sel
sv: Osaltade baguetter, Baguetter utan salt